Washington statutes.
RCW 10.97.020

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Washington State Criminal Records Privacy Act.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 314 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The phrase "This 1977 amendatory act" has been changed to "This chapter." This 1977 amendatory act [1977 ex.s. c 314] consists of chapter 10.97 RCW and the amendments of RCW 42.17.310, 43.43.705, 43.43.710, 43.43.730, and 43.43.810.